Utah statutes.
63C-7-305.   Investment of the Utah Communications Agency Network funds.
The state treasurer shall invest all moneys held on deposit by or on behalf of
the Utah Communications Agency Network.  The executive committee may provide
advice to the state treasurer concerning investment of the moneys of the Utah
Communications Agency Network.
